dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Dg Y 78
SFX Dg ti l .
SFX Dg ti la .
SFX Dg ti lo .
SFX Dg ti li .
SFX Dg hati dų .
SFX Dg hati dem .
SFX Dg hati deš .
SFX Dg hati de .
SFX Dg hati demȯ .
SFX Dg hati dete .
SFX Dg hati dųt .
SFX Dg ti h .
SFX Dg ti še .
SFX Dg ti hmȯ .
SFX Dg ti ste .
SFX Dg ti hų .
SFX Dg hati di .
SFX Dg hati dimȯ .
SFX Dg hati dite .
SFX Dg hati dųći .
SFX Dg hati dųćego .
SFX Dg hati dųćemu .
SFX Dg hati dųćim .
SFX Dg hati dųćem .
SFX Dg hati dųćih .
SFX Dg hati dųćimi .
SFX Dg hati dųća .
SFX Dg hati dųće .
SFX Dg hati domy .
SFX Dg hati domogo .
SFX Dg hati domomu .
SFX Dg hati domym .
SFX Dg hati domom .
SFX Dg hati domo .
SFX Dg hati doma .
SFX Dg hati domų .
SFX Dg hati domoj .
SFX Dg hati domojų .
SFX Dg hati domi .
SFX Dg hati dome .
SFX Dg hati domyh .
SFX Dg hati domym .
SFX Dg hati domymi .
SFX Dg hati domo .
SFX Dg ti vši .
SFX Dg ti všego .
SFX Dg ti všemu .
SFX Dg ti všim .
SFX Dg ti všem .
SFX Dg ti vših .
SFX Dg ti všimi .
SFX Dg ti vša .
SFX Dg ti všų .
SFX Dg ti všej .
SFX Dg ti všejų .
SFX Dg ti vše .
SFX Dg ti ny .
SFX Dg ti nogo .
SFX Dg ti nomu .
SFX Dg ti nym .
SFX Dg ti nom .
SFX Dg ti ni .
SFX Dg ti ne .
SFX Dg ti nyh .
SFX Dg ti nymi .
SFX Dg ti na .
SFX Dg ti nų .
SFX Dg ti noj .
SFX Dg ti nojų .
SFX Dg ti no .
SFX Dg ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Dg ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Dg ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Dg ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Dg ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Dg ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Dg ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Dg ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Dh Y 7
SFX Dh o a .
SFX Dh to ȯt .
SFX Dh o u .
SFX Dh o ah .
SFX Dh o am .
SFX Dh 0 m .
SFX Dh o ami .

SFX Di Y 69
SFX Di ti l .
SFX Di ti la .
SFX Di ti lo .
SFX Di ti li .
SFX Di ati jų .
SFX Di ati im .
SFX Di ati iš .
SFX Di ati i .
SFX Di ati imȯ .
SFX Di ati ite .
SFX Di ati ęt .
SFX Di ti h .
SFX Di ti še .
SFX Di ti hmȯ .
SFX Di ti ste .
SFX Di ti hų .
SFX Di ati ęći .
SFX Di ati ęća .
SFX Di ati ęće .
SFX Di ati imy .
SFX Di ati imogo .
SFX Di ati imomu .
SFX Di ati imym .
SFX Di ati imom .
SFX Di ati imo .
SFX Di ati ima .
SFX Di ati imų .
SFX Di ati imoj .
SFX Di ati imojų .
SFX Di ati imi .
SFX Di ati ime .
SFX Di ati imyh .
SFX Di ati imym .
SFX Di ati imymi .
SFX Di ati imo .
SFX Di ti vši .
SFX Di ti všego .
SFX Di ti všemu .
SFX Di ti všim .
SFX Di ti všem .
SFX Di ti vših .
SFX Di ti všimi .
SFX Di ti vša .
SFX Di ti všų .
SFX Di ti všej .
SFX Di ti všejų .
SFX Di ti vše .
SFX Di ti ny .
SFX Di ti nogo .
SFX Di ti nomu .
SFX Di ti nym .
SFX Di ti nom .
SFX Di ti ni .
SFX Di ti ne .
SFX Di ti nyh .
SFX Di ti nymi .
SFX Di ti na .
SFX Di ti nų .
SFX Di ti noj .
SFX Di ti nojų .
SFX Di ti no .
SFX Di ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Di ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Di ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Di ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Di ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Di ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Di ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Di ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Dj Y 12
SFX Dj 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dj ę ena/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę ene/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę en/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę eni/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę enu/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę enah/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę enam/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę enem/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę enom/xPxE .
SFX Dj ę enami/xPxE .

SFX Dk Y 9
SFX Dk 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dk e e/xPxBxO .
SFX Dk e a/xPxE .
SFX Dk ďje dij/xPxE .
SFX Dk e u/xPxE .
SFX Dk e ah/xPxE .
SFX Dk e am/xPxE .
SFX Dk 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Dk e ami/xPxE .

SFX Dl Y 4
SFX Dl ťsȯt tisȯt .
SFX Dl ťsȯt tistah .
SFX Dl ťsȯt tistam .
SFX Dl sȯt jųstami .

SFX Dm Y 12
SFX Dm 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dm 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dm es ės/xPxE .
SFX Dm es si/xPxE .
SFX Dm es sa/xPxE .
SFX Dm es sov/xPxE .
SFX Dm es su/xPxE .
SFX Dm es sah/xPxE .
SFX Dm es sam/xPxE .
SFX Dm es som/xPxE .
SFX Dm es sami/xPxE .
SFX Dm es se/xPxE .

SFX Dn Y 11
SFX Dn 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dn i o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dn i je/xPxE .
SFX Dn i jų/xPxE .
SFX Dn i ej/xPxE .
SFX Dn i ji/xPxE .
SFX Dn i jah/xPxE .
SFX Dn i jam/xPxE .
SFX Dn i jejų/xPxE .
SFX Dn i jami/xPxE .
SFX Dn i jo/xPxE .

SFX Do Y 69
SFX Do ti l .
SFX Do ti la .
SFX Do ti lo .
SFX Do ti li .
SFX Do ypěti ipjų .
SFX Do ypěti ipim .
SFX Do ypěti ipiš .
SFX Do ypěti ipi .
SFX Do ypěti ipimȯ .
SFX Do ypěti ipite .
SFX Do ypěti ipęt .
SFX Do ti h .
SFX Do ti še .
SFX Do ti hmȯ .
SFX Do ti ste .
SFX Do ti hų .
SFX Do ypěti ipęći .
SFX Do ypěti ipęća .
SFX Do ypěti ipęće .
SFX Do ypěti ipimy .
SFX Do ypěti ipimogo .
SFX Do ypěti ipimomu .
SFX Do ypěti ipimym .
SFX Do ypěti ipimom .
SFX Do ypěti ipimo .
SFX Do ypěti ipima .
SFX Do ypěti ipimų .
SFX Do ypěti ipimoj .
SFX Do ypěti ipimojų .
SFX Do ypěti ipimi .
SFX Do ypěti ipime .
SFX Do ypěti ipimyh .
SFX Do ypěti ipimym .
SFX Do ypěti ipimymi .
SFX Do ypěti ipimo .
SFX Do ti vši .
SFX Do ti všego .
SFX Do ti všemu .
SFX Do ti všim .
SFX Do ti všem .
SFX Do ti vših .
SFX Do ti všimi .
SFX Do ti vša .
SFX Do ti všų .
SFX Do ti všej .
SFX Do ti všejų .
SFX Do ti vše .
SFX Do ti ny .
SFX Do ti nogo .
SFX Do ti nomu .
SFX Do ti nym .
SFX Do ti nom .
SFX Do ti ni .
SFX Do ti ne .
SFX Do ti nyh .
SFX Do ti nymi .
SFX Do ti na .
SFX Do ti nų .
SFX Do ti noj .
SFX Do ti nojų .
SFX Do ti no .
SFX Do ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Do ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Do ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Do ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Do ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Do ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Do ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Do ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Dp Y 11
SFX Dp 0 e .
SFX Dp 0 i .
SFX Dp 0 a .
SFX Dp 0 ev .
SFX Dp 0 ij .
SFX Dp 0 u .
SFX Dp 0 ah .
SFX Dp 0 am .
SFX Dp 0 em .
SFX Dp 0 jų .
SFX Dp 0 ami .

SFX Dq Y 4
SFX Dq 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dq 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dq ś si/xPxE .
SFX Dq 0 jų/xPxE .

SFX Dr Y 11
SFX Dr 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dr a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dr ȯha hy/xPxE .
SFX Dr ȯha hų/xPxE .
SFX Dr ȯha h/xPxE .
SFX Dr ȯha hě/xPxE .
SFX Dr ȯha hah/xPxE .
SFX Dr ȯha ham/xPxE .
SFX Dr ȯha hojų/xPxE .
SFX Dr ȯha hami/xPxE .
SFX Dr ȯha ho/xPxE .

SFX Ds Y 11
SFX Ds 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ds o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Ds o a/xPxE .
SFX Ds no ȯn/xPxE .
SFX Ds o u/xPxE .
SFX Ds o ah/xPxE .
SFX Ds o am/xPxE .
SFX Ds 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ds o ami/xPxE .
SFX Ds no en/xPxE .
SFX Ds o ju/xPxE .

SFX Dt Y 21
SFX Dt 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Dt ȯb b/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb by/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 y/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb ba/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb bov/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb bu/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb bah/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb bam/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb bom/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb bami/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Dt ȯb be/xPxE .
SFX Dt 0 e/xPxE .

SFX Du Y 6
SFX Du 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Du i e/xPxBxO .
SFX Du i ov/xPxE .
SFX Du i ah/xPxE .
SFX Du i am/xPxE .
SFX Du i ami/xPxE .

SFX Dv Y 78
SFX Dv ti l .
SFX Dv ti la .
SFX Dv ti lo .
SFX Dv ti li .
SFX Dv vati jų .
SFX Dv vati jem .
SFX Dv vati ješ .
SFX Dv vati je .
SFX Dv vati jemȯ .
SFX Dv vati jete .
SFX Dv vati jųt .
SFX Dv ti h .
SFX Dv ti še .
SFX Dv ti hmȯ .
SFX Dv ti ste .
SFX Dv ti hų .
SFX Dv vati j .
SFX Dv vati jmȯ .
SFX Dv vati jte .
SFX Dv vati jųći .
SFX Dv vati jųćego .
SFX Dv vati jųćemu .
SFX Dv vati jųćim .
SFX Dv vati jųćem .
SFX Dv vati jųćih .
SFX Dv vati jųćimi .
SFX Dv vati jųća .
SFX Dv vati jųće .
SFX Dv vati jemy .
SFX Dv vati jemogo .
SFX Dv vati jemomu .
SFX Dv vati jemym .
SFX Dv vati jemom .
SFX Dv vati jemo .
SFX Dv vati jema .
SFX Dv vati jemų .
SFX Dv vati jemoj .
SFX Dv vati jemojų .
SFX Dv vati jemi .
SFX Dv vati jeme .
SFX Dv vati jemyh .
SFX Dv vati jemym .
SFX Dv vati jemymi .
SFX Dv vati jemo .
SFX Dv ti vši .
SFX Dv ti všego .
SFX Dv ti všemu .
SFX Dv ti všim .
SFX Dv ti všem .
SFX Dv ti vših .
SFX Dv ti všimi .
SFX Dv ti vša .
SFX Dv ti všų .
SFX Dv ti všej .
SFX Dv ti všejų .
SFX Dv ti vše .
SFX Dv ti ny .
SFX Dv ti nogo .
SFX Dv ti nomu .
SFX Dv ti nym .
SFX Dv ti nom .
SFX Dv ti ni .
SFX Dv ti ne .
SFX Dv ti nyh .
SFX Dv ti nymi .
SFX Dv ti na .
SFX Dv ti nų .
SFX Dv ti noj .
SFX Dv ti nojų .
SFX Dv ti no .
SFX Dv ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Dv ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Dv ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Dv ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Dv ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Dv ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Dv ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Dv ti ńjah/xPxE .
