dictionaries/isv_etm_hunspell_dict.dic
jehati/Dg
sto/Dh
spati/Di
zaimę/Dj
orųďje/Dk
pęťsȯt/Dl
vrěmę/Dj
pes/Dm
pani/Dn
kypěti/Do
tysęć/Dp
běloruś/Dq
blȯha/Dr
dno/Ds
lȯb/Dt
groši/Du
žuvati/Dv
pojehati/Dg
prědsųďje/Dk
prospati/Di
prijehati/Dg
dojehati/Dg
izjehati/Dg
odjehati/Dg
projehati/Dg
vjehati/Dg
ujehati/Dg
blizneci/Du
jehati/Dg
městoimę/Dj
pravosųďje/Dk
prědgråďje/Dk
prěspati/Di
prězimę/Dj
sěmę/Dj
pozaďje/Dk
starci/Du
znamę/Dj
brěmę/Dj
imę/Dj
ramę/Dj
plemę/Dj
bogyni/Dn
vymę/Dj
zaspati/Di
piśmę/Dj
råzvoďje/Dk
meduvrěmę/Dj
sųzvězďje/Dk
blizneci/Du
grozďje/Dk
krȯha/Dr
naspati/Di
objehati/Dg
vyspati/Di
zaspati/Di
prospati/Di
pospati/Di
råzjehati/Dg
prěžuvati/Dv
stremę/Dj
izlivati/Dv
